Washington, session 2025-2026, SB5850.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:Sec. 1. RCW 29A.84.250 and 2024 c 164 s 508 are each amended to read as follows:((Every person is guilty of a gross misdemeanor who:))(1) A person is guilty of unlawful interference with the initiative and referendum process if the person:(a) For any consideration or gratuity or promise thereof, signs or declines to sign any initiative or referendum petition; or(((2)))(b) Provides or receives consideration for soliciting or procuring signatures on an initiative or referendum petition if any part of the consideration is based upon the number of signatures solicited or procured, or offers to provide or agrees to receive such consideration any of which is based on the number of signatures solicited or procured; or(((3)))(c) Gives or offers any consideration or gratuity to any person to induce him or her to sign or not to sign or to vote for or against any initiative or referendum measure; or(((4)))(d) Interferes with or attempts to interfere with the right of any voter to sign or not to sign an initiative or referendum petition or with the right to vote for or against an initiative or referendum measure by threats, harassment, intimidation, defacing a physical initiative or referendum petition, or any other corrupt means or practice; or(((5)))(e) Publicly protests another person collecting signatures for or signing any initiative or referendum petition within 25 feet of the person collecting signatures or the person signing or attempting to sign any initiative or referendum petition; or(f) Receives, handles, distributes, pays out, or gives away, directly or indirectly, money or any other thing of value contributed by or received from any person, firm, association, or corporation whose residence or principal office is, or the majority of whose members or stockholders have their residence outside, the state of Washington, for any service rendered for the purpose of aiding in procuring signatures upon any initiative or referendum petition or for the purpose of aiding in the adoption or rejection of any initiative or referendum measure. This subsection does not apply to or prohibit any activity that is properly reported in accordance with the applicable provisions of Title 29B RCW.(2)(a) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, a person who unlawfully interferes with the initiative and referendum process is guilty of a gross misdemeanor. A gross misdemeanor under this section is punishable to the same extent as a gross misdemeanor that is punishable under RCW 9A.20.021.(b) A person who unlawfully interferes with the initiative and referendum process is guilty of a class C felony if the person has previously been convicted in this state of unlawful interference with the initiative and referendum process. A class C felony under this section is punishable to the same extent as a class C felony that is punishable under RCW 9A.20.021.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 29A.84 RCW to read as follows:A person who receives possession of a signed initiative or referendum petition with the intent to destroy or alter the signed initiative or referendum petition, prevent its delivery to a proper official, or deliver it to a person other than a proper official is guilty of a class C felony, punishable under RCW 9A.20.021.--- END ---